Utah statutes.
70A-2a-217.   Identification.

Identification of goods as goods to which a lease contract refers may be made at any time and in any manner explicitly agreed to by the parties.  In the absence of explicit agreement, identification occurs:

(1)  when the lease contract is made if the lease contract is for a lease of goods that are existing and identified;

(2)  when the goods are shipped, marked, or otherwise designated by the lessor as goods to which the lease contract refers if the lease contract is for a lease of goods that are not existing and identified; or

(3)  when the young are conceived if the lease contract is for a lease of unborn young of animals.



Enacted by Chapter 197, 1990 General Session

